Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5907
State Fire Code classification.

For purposes of the State Fire Code under section 81-503.01, an assisted-living facility shall be classified as (1) residential board and care if the facility meets the residential board and care classification requirements of the State Fire Code or (2) limited care if the facility meets the limited care classification requirements of the State Fire Code.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 51;

Laws 2019, LB195, § 1.